Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202571-5662
Student loan; medical resident incentive; loan repayment; eligibility.

(1) To be eligible for a student loan under the Rural Health Systems and Professional Incentive Act, an applicant or a recipient shall be enrolled or accepted for enrollment in any of the following accredited programs in Nebraska:

(a) Medical or dental education program;

(b) Physician assistant education program;

(c) Nurse anesthesia practice program;

(d) Dietitian nutritionist program; or

(e) Approved mental health practice program in Nebraska.

(2) To be eligible for the medical resident incentive under the act, an applicant or a recipient shall be enrolled or accepted for enrollment in an approved medical specialty residency program in Nebraska.

(3) To be eligible for loan repayment under the act, an applicant or a recipient shall:

(a) Be one of the following:

(i) A pharmacist;

(ii) A dentist;

(iii) A physical therapist;

(iv) An occupational therapist;

(v) A mental health practitioner;

(vi) A psychologist licensed under the requirements of section 38-3114 or the equivalent thereof;

(vii) A nurse practitioner;

(viii) A nurse anesthetist;

(ix) A physician assistant;

(x) A dietitian nutritionist licensed under section 38-1813;

(xi) A psychiatrist; or

(xii) A physician in an approved specialty;

(b) Be licensed to practice in Nebraska;

(c) Not be enrolled in a residency program;

(d) Not be practicing under a provisional or temporary license; and

(e) Enter practice in a designated health profession shortage area in Nebraska.

Laws 1991, LB 400, § 13;

Laws 1994, LB 1223, § 59;

Laws 1996, LB 1155, § 51;

Laws 1997, LB 577, § 2;

Laws 2000, LB 1115, § 81;

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 104;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1234;

Laws 2008, LB797, § 19;

Laws 2015, LB196, § 5;

Laws 2023, LB50, § 37;

Laws 2025, LB312, § 1.